Massachusetts, session 194th, S2359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 21N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definitions:-
“Zero-emission transit infrastructure”, electric multiple units, electric battery chargers,
trolleybus and railway catenary wire, and other equipment to support the operation of electric
vehicles.
“Fully electrified service”, public transit conveyance that utilizes zero-emission transit
infrastructure and does not produce direct emissions.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 21N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
Section 7, the following section:-
of 3

Section 7½. (a) To contribute to the Commonwealth’s greenhouse gas reduction targets,
the secretary, in consultation with the department of energy resources, department of
transportation, department of environmental protection, department of public utilities, and
intergovernmental coordinating council established by the Acts of 2022, chapter 179, section 81
shall develop and enforce targets for public transit electrification across all modes of travel. Said
targets shall be included and updated in all roadmap plans required under this chapter at the same
intervals of sublimits required under section 3.
(b) The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority and its commuter rail contractor
shall provide fully electrified service on the commuter rail system by December 31, 2035 and
ensure sufficient zero-emission transit infrastructure is in place to accomplish said timeline.
SECTION 3. (a) The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall develop and
implement short-term, medium-term and long-term electrification and performance improvement
plans for each line of the commuter rail system ensuring that the line is fully integrated into the
commonwealth’s transportation system and designed to make the system more productive,
equitable, and decarbonized. Each plan shall maximize the ridership returns on investment and
shall be designed to meet statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits and sublimits established in
chapter 21N of the General Laws.
(b)(1) The authority shall include in the short-term plan immediate action items to run
fully electrified service as defined under chapter 21N of the General Laws along the
Providence/Stoughton commuter rail line, the Fairmont commuter rail line and the segment of
the Newburyport commuter rail line and the Rockport commuter rail line that extends from the
city of Boston to the city of Beverly by December 31, 2029. The plan shall ensure that the
of 3

authority gives priority consideration to lines serving environmental justice populations as
defined in section 62 of chapter 30 for subsequent deployment of electrified service. The plan
shall include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed critical path schedule for each phase; (ii) cash
flow needs organized by fiscal year through completion of each phase; (iii) a regional strategy to
receive all necessary environmental approvals and permits; (iv) identification of needs from
utilities to achieve adequate and redundant power to update the system; (v) a platform strategy
that would enable the utilization of fully automated doors; (vi)target completion dates; (vii) a
conceptual work plan; and (viii) a schedule outlining the work to be pursued over the course of
the Fiscal Year 2025-2029 Capital Plan.
(2) The authority shall include in its medium-term and long-term plans a comprehensive
and specific plan to provide fully electrified service on the remainder of the commuter rail fleet
for all commuter rail lines as necessary to maximize the ridership returns on investment and
comply with chapter 21N of the General Laws. The plan shall include, but not be limited to,
necessary updates to layover and maintenance facilities, necessary infrastructure upgrades and a
schedule for fleet design, testing, procurement and deployment. The plan shall also include a
detailed approach to platform heights that would enable the deployment of fully automated
doors.
(c) The authority shall publish and receive public comment on its short-term plan under
paragraph (1) of subsection (b) not later than November 1, 2026 or 180 days after the effective
date of this act, whichever is later. The authority shall publish and receive public comment on its
medium-term and long-term plans under paragraph (2) of said subsection (b) not later than
December 31, 2028.
of 3